District of Columbia statutes.
42-2625

Rulemaking.

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate rules to govern the operation of the Fund, including but not limited to, rules establishing eligibility requirements for applicants and homes and for establishing operating procedures for the program. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. Nothing in this section shall affect any requirements imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-266, § 6, 46 DCR 948
1981 Ed., § 45-2215.